Utah statutes.
75-1-102.   Purposes -- Rule of construction.

(1) This code shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(2)  The underlying purposes and policies of this code are:

(a)  To simplify and clarify the law concerning the affairs of decedents, missing persons, protected persons, minors, and incapacitated persons;

(b)  To discover and make effective the intent of a decedent in distribution of his property;

(c)  To promote a speedy and efficient system for administering the estate of the decedent and making distribution to his successors;

(d)  To facilitate use and enforcement of certain trusts; and

(e)  To make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

